Utah statutes.
53-6-211.5.   Voluntary relinquishment of peace officer certification.

(1)  A peace officer may voluntarily relinquish the peace officer's certification to the division at any time when a disciplinary issue regarding the peace officer has been referred to the division.

(2) (a)  A peace officer who voluntarily relinquishes certification under this section may not subsequently be certified as a peace officer in this state.

(b)  This section does not apply to a peace officer whose certification has become inactive as provided in Section 53-6-208.



Enacted by Chapter 313, 2010 General Session

